Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB217.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART XXIFOOD SECURITYChapter121. Fresh Food Financing InitiativeCHAPTER 121FRESH FOOD FINANCING INITIATIVESec.12101. Scope of chapter.12102. Definitions.12103. The Fresh Food Financing Initiative.12104. Grant fund eligibility.123456789101112131415161718 12105. Grant money.§ 12101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Fresh Food Financing Initiative.§ 12102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Farmers' market." A building, structure or place owned, leased or otherwise in possession by a person, municipal corporation or public or private organization, used or intended to be used by two or more farmers or an association of farmers for the purpose of selling agricultural commodities directly to consumers and which is physically located within this Commonwealth."Food access organization." A nonprofit organization with expertise in improving access to food in underserved communities."Grant." A grant awarded under section 12103(f) (relating to the Fresh Food Financing Initiative)."Grocery store." A for-profit or not-for-profit self-service retail establishment that primarily sells meat, seafood, fruits, vegetables, dairy products, dry groceries, household products and sundries."Program." The Fresh Food Financing Initiative established under section 12103(a)."Regional anchor supermarket." A company that owns multiple grocery stores within a given region."Retail food establishment." As defined under section 5702 (relating to definitions)."Underserved community." A census tract determined to be an 20250SB0217PN0164 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area with low grocery store access by either the United States Department of Agriculture as identified in the Food Access Research Atlas, or through a methodology that has been adopted for use by another governmental entity, food access organization or the secretary."USDA-designated food desert." A census tract declared to be a food desert by the United States Department of Agriculture's Economic Research Service.§ 12103. The Fresh Food Financing Initiative.(a) Establishment.--The Fresh Food Financing Initiative is established within the department.(b) Administration of program.--The program shall be administered by the department. The department may collaborate with the Department of Community and Economic Development to improve food access in this Commonwealth.(c) Program management.--The department shall develop and establish program guidelines and eligibility criteria to meet the needs of program applicants and the communities served.(d) Program priority.--(1) The program shall promote local agricultural products by placing priority on projects producing, aggregating, sourcing or selling Pennsylvania agricultural commodities, including the department's Pennsylvania Preferred® Program, that:(i) are located in or serve a USDA-designated food desert;(ii) increase business opportunities for businesses recognized by the Department of General Services as verified as a small diverse business or a small veteran business; or20250SB0217PN0164 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) are accompanied with matching private funds.(2) (Reserved).(e) Project class.--The department shall make grants available in the following classes:(1) Regional anchor supermarkets.(2) Grocery stores.(3) Retail food establishments.(4) Farmers markets.(f) Grants.--Grants in an amount not to exceed 15% of the funding for any of the project classes established under subsection (e) shall be awarded to qualifying applicants selected to receive the awards for the purposes of capital projects.(g) Matching funds.--A grant awarded to a regional anchor supermarket under the program must be matched by private funds in an amount equal to the grant.(h) Administrative or operational costs.--No more than 10% of the funding under section 12105 (relating to grant money) may be reserved for administrative and operational costs to manage the program. Costs for personnel may be included as part of the department's administrative or operational costs.§ 12104. Grant fund eligibility.(a) Eligible applicants.--An entity that meets the following criteria shall be eligible to apply for a grant under the program:(1) The primary business, measured as being greater than or equal to 50% of the entity's previous year's annual revenue, is from the sale of staple and perishable food to consumers or direct to retail settings.(2) The entity operates and provides service in this 20250SB0217PN0164 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(3) The entity serves customers that live in an underserved community.(4) The entity provides access to affordable, high- quality fresh produce, meat and dairy products and other grocery items for shoppers in an underserved community.(b) Eligible uses.--An eligible use for grant money includes any of the following:(1) Costs to expand access to Pennsylvania grown or processed produce, dairy and meat products or provide stable market access for Pennsylvania farmers.(2) Innovative food access technology that assists an existing or new grocery store.(3) Innovative food access technology that assists the food access efforts of a retail food establishment.(4) Innovative food access technology or delivery of food to retail that assists the food access efforts of an eligible applicant.(c) Application review and approval.--The department shall devise, award and administer grants to eligible applicants.(d) Standards and requirements.--(1) The department shall establish grant program standards and requirements for a grant program under this chapter and shall transmit notice of the grant program standards and requirements to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Grant program standards and requirements shall:(i) Establish eligibility standards for applicants.(ii) Describe the objectives of the grant program, 20250SB0217PN0164 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which shall be consistent with this chapter.(iii) Establish caps, limits and restrictions with respect to grant amounts.(iv) Establish an application process and timetable.(v) Present the criteria under which grant applications shall be evaluated by the department.(vi) Establish a timetable within which the department shall award or disapprove a completed grant application.(vii) Establish procedures by which the department shall verify expenditures of grant money by a grant recipient.(e) Disposition of grants.--(1) The department may require a written agreement describing the terms and conditions of the grant.(2) The department may establish criteria under which the secretary may demand the return of all or a portion of the grant money.(3) The secretary may approve a grant in less than a requested amount. The secretary may also impose restrictions or special conditions upon the issuance of a grant.(4) The secretary shall ensure that the grant money awarded under this chapter is geographically disbursed throughout this Commonwealth.§ 12105. Grant money.The Fresh Food Financing Initiative Restricted Account is established in the General Fund and shall be used exclusively for the program in accordance with this chapter. Grants may only be awarded to the extent money is appropriated by the General Assembly. In addition to money appropriated to the department 20250SB0217PN0164 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the program, the department may also accept other revenue, including Federal appropriations, for deposit into the restricted account for the sole purpose of awarding grants and administering the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0217PN0164 - 7 - 12345